California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary license, the board shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The board shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the board.

(d) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee.

(e) For purposes of issuing a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the board shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license for applicants who were issued a probationary license.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.2.

(a) If a psychiatric technician has knowledge that another person has committed any act prohibited by Section 4521, the psychiatric technician shall report this information to the board in writing and shall cooperate with the board in furnishing information or assistance as may be required.

(b) Any employer of a psychiatric technician shall report to the board the suspension or termination for cause, or resignation for cause, of any psychiatric technician in their employ. In the case of psychiatric technicians employed by the state, the report shall not be made until after the conclusion of the review process specified in Section 52.6 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations and Skelly v. State Personnel Bd. (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194. The reporting required
 herein shall not constitute a waiver of confidentiality of medical records. The information reported or disclosed shall be kept confidential except as provided in subdivision (d), and shall not be subject to discovery in civil cases.

(c) An employment agency or nursing registry shall report to the board the rejection from assignment of a licensed psychiatric technician by a health facility or home health care provider due to acts that would be cause for suspension or termination as described in subdivision (d).

(d) For purposes of this section, “suspension, termination, or resignation for cause” or “rejection from assignment” are defined as suspension, termination, or resignation from employment, or rejection from assignment, for any of the following reasons:

(1) Use of controlled substances or alcohol to such an
 extent that it impairs the licensee’s ability to safely practice as a psychiatric technician.

(2) Unlawful sale of controlled substances or other prescription items.

(3) Patient or client abuse, neglect, physical harm, or sexual contact with a patient or client.

(4) Falsification of medical records.

(5) Gross negligence or incompetence.

(6) Theft from patients or clients, other employees, or the employer.

(e) Failure of an employer to make a report required by this section is punishable by an administrative fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(f) Pursuant to Section 43.8 of the Civil Code, no person shall incur any civil penalty as a result of making any report required by this chapter.

(g) The board shall implement this section contingent upon necessary funding being provided in the annual Budget Act.

(h) For purposes of this section, “employer” includes employment agencies and nursing registries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 45.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.6.

The board may deny any application or may suspend or revoke any license or permit issued under this chapter, for any of the following:

(a) The denial of licensure, suspension, restriction of license, or voluntary surrender following the initiation of disciplinary action by another state or other government agency, of a license, registration, permit, or certificate to practice as a health care professional shall constitute grounds for denial of a permit or license or for disciplinary action against a licensee. A certified copy of the finding from another state which establishes an act which if committed in California would be grounds for discipline shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) The denial of licensure, suspension, restriction of license, or voluntary surrender following the initiation of disciplinary action by another California health care professional licensing board shall constitute grounds for denial of a permit or license or for disciplinary action against a licensee. A certified copy of the decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4522.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4521 or any other law, the board may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time a license under this chapter on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this chapter. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The board may deny a license to an applicant on any of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denial of an application for a license, the board shall provide a
 statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the board’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the board’s decision was based on the applicant’s prior criminal conviction, justifies the board’s denial of a license and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed psychiatric technician.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the denial of a license is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the board shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of the applicant’s criminal history record if the applicant makes a written request to the board for a copy, specifying an address to which it is to be sent.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the board to any employer.

(C) The board shall retain a copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The board shall make that information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the board shall conduct a hearing of a license denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the board shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 46.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4523.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a psychiatric technician is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has lapsed, or the judgment or conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw the plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or
 indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 47.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4524.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked, suspended, surrendered, or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the disciplinary order or if any portion of the order is stayed by the board itself or by the superior court, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for the reinstatement of a license that was revoked or surrendered, except that the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order a lesser period of
 time, which shall be no less than one year to petition for reinstatement.

(2) At least two years for the early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for the early termination of a probation period of less than three years.

(4) At least one year for the modification of a condition of probation, or for the reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness.

(b) The board shall give notice to the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and an opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times
 have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The board itself or the administrative law judge, if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(d) The board may grant or deny the petition or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

(e) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole or subject to an order of registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. No petition shall be considered
 while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(f) Except in those cases where the petitioner has been disciplined for a violation of Section 822, the board may in its discretion deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter the provisions of Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 48.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Schools for Preparation of Psychiatric Technicians [4530. - 4532.]

4530.

The board shall prepare and maintain a list of approved schools which offer an approved program for psychiatric technicians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 21.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4531.

The course of instruction of an approved school shall consist of not less than the number of hours or semester units of instruction required for the other program administered by the board. The subjects of instruction shall include the principles of the care of the mentally disabled and the developmentally disabled. Clinical inpatient experience shall be an integral part of that prescribed or equivalent course of study and training. The experience shall be obtained in a state hospital, except where the board finds that the requirement is not feasible due either to the distance of a state hospital from the school or the unavailability, as determined by the State Department of Developmental Services or the State Department of State Hospitals, of state hospital clinical training
 placements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 5.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4531.1.

(a) The approval process for a school or program shall be consistent with the following timelines:

(1) (A) Upon receipt of a complete letter of intent to submit an application for approval as a school or program for psychiatric technicians, the board shall notify the proposed school or program of the steps in the approval process and provide an estimated wait time until active assignment to a nursing education consultant.

(B) A school or program for psychiatric technicians that fails to submit a complete letter of intent within 30 days from the date the board notifies the school or program of deficiencies shall be taken out of consideration for approval as a new school or program
 and may only reapply after six months.

(C) Upon active assignment of a nursing education consultant, the school or program shall submit an initial application for approval within 60 days.

(2) (A) Within 30 days of the date the board receives an initial application for approval, the board shall notify the school or program whether the application is complete.

(B) A notice that an initial application is not complete shall specify what additional documents or payment of fees the school or program is required to submit to the board to make the application complete.

(3) Within 60 days from the date the board notifies the school or program that the initial application is not complete, the school or program shall provide the missing
 information. If a school or program fails to submit the required information, the board shall take the application out of consideration consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 4531.2.

(4) Within six months of the date the board receives an initial application for approval as a school or program, the board shall approve the school or program, deny approval, or notify the school or program that corrective action is required.

(b) A school or program for psychiatric technicians seeking approval by the board shall remit to the board for deposit in the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund fees in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The nonrefundable initial application fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in reviewing and processing the application up to
 five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the final approval fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in the application approval process up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(B) The final approval fee for an applicant program that meets both of the following criteria shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in the application approval process up to five thousand dollars ($5,000):

(i) The program is affiliated with an approved school or program that is in good standing.

(ii) The program utilizes the curriculum and policies approved by the board for the approved school or program.

(3) The continuing approval fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in providing oversight and review of a school or program up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) once every four years.

(c) If the board makes an initial determination that the cost of providing oversight and review of a school or program under this section is less than the amount of any fees required to be paid by that school or program, the board shall decrease the fees applicable to that institution to an amount that is proportional to the board’s reasonable costs associated with that school or program.

(d) The board may reduce the continuing approval fees, by no more than one-half of the established fee, for a program that experiences a reduction in enrollment capacity that directly leads to a reduction in state
 funding. The board shall require a program to provide documentation for the purposes of issuing the fee reduction.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 10.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4531.2.

(a) The board shall maintain a list of inactive schools and programs for psychiatric technicians seeking board approval.

(b) A school or program for psychiatric technicians seeking board approval shall respond to the board within two weeks of each inquiry or request during all phases of the application process after the school or program has submitted an initial application for approval pursuant to Section 4531.1. A school or program that does not respond within two weeks, fails to submit documentation required by the board in time, or fails to pay the required fees, shall be designated as inactive.

(c) A school or program for psychiatric technicians seeking board approval that has been on the
 inactive list for 90 days over the course of the application period shall be taken out of consideration for a new school or program and may only reapply after six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 11.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4532.

(a) It shall be the duty of the board, through an official representative, to inspect or review all schools or programs for psychiatric technicians in this state at such times as the board shall deem necessary. Written reports of the inspection or review shall be made to the board, which shall then approve the schools or programs that meet the requirements provided by the board.

(b) (1) Upon receiving the report of the representative, if the board determines that any school or program for psychiatric technicians is not maintaining the standard required by the board, notice thereof in writing specifying the defect or defects shall be immediately given to the school or program. If the defects are not corrected within a reasonable time, the school
 or program may be issued a citation and assessed a fine as specified under subdivision (c) or removed from the approved list and notice thereof in writing given to it.

(2) Until the board establishes regulations pursuant to subdivision (c), a school or program may only be removed from the approved list if defects are not corrected within a reasonable time.

(c) (1) The board may issue a citation, which may contain an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, if it has established, by regulation, a system for the issuance of citations to a psychiatric technician school or program that is consistent with Section 125.9.

(2) In the event that the school or program does not remit the assessed fine within 30 days, the board may place the school or program on provisional approval for
 up to six months or remove it from the approved school or program list and give it written notice of the removal.

(d) A school or program for psychiatric technicians removed from the approved list may apply for approval after 12 months from the date of their removal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 12.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Penal Provisions [4540. - 4543.]

4540.

After January 1, 1970, no person shall perform services described in Section 4502 without a license issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4541.

It is unlawful for any person to use any title or letters that imply that the person is a certified or licensed psychiatric technician unless at the time of so doing the person holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked certificate or license issued under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 51.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4542.

(a) It is unlawful for any person willfully to make any false representation or impersonate any other person in connection with any examination or application for a license.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to permit or aid any other person in any manner to impersonate that person in connection with any examination or application for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 52.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4543.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 18.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [4544. - 4548.]

4544.

A license expires each year on that date prescribed by the board, if not renewed. To renew an unexpired license the holder thereof shall, on or before each of the dates on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 376, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4544.5.

The board may establish a biennial renewal period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.

Except as provided in Section 4545.2, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within four years after its expiration on filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees, and payment of all fees required by this chapter. If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the holder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 4544 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

A certificate which was forfeited for failure to renew under the law in effect before October 1, 1961, shall, for the purposes of this article, be considered to have expired on the date that it became forfeited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 435, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.1.

A suspended certificate is subject to expiration in the same manner as provided in this article for an unsuspended certificate, is subject to renewal in the same manner as provided in this article for an unsuspended certificate, and is subject to the provisions of this section relating to a suspended license.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the license, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.2.

A revoked certificate is subject to expiration in the same manner as provided in this article for an unrevoked certificate, but it may not be renewed. An application for reinstatement of a revoked certificate shall be deemed an application for reinstatement of a revoked license and shall be processed as such. The board shall issue a psychiatric technician’s license to each holder of a psychiatric technician certificate who qualifies for reinstatement pursuant to this chapter and who applies for reinstatement.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the license shall, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.3.

A certificate and the holder thereof are subject to this section in the same manner as are a license and the holder thereof.

A license that is not renewed within four years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter, but the holder may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following apply:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that would justify denial of the license under Section 480.

(b) The holder pays all of the fees that would be required if the holder were applying for a license for the first time.

(c) The
 holder takes and passes the examination, if any, which would be required if the holder were applying for the license for the first time, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, the holder is qualified to perform the services described in Section 4502.

The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 53.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.4.

(a) The board, upon application and payment of the fee established pursuant to subdivision (h), shall issue a retired license to a licensee if the licensee holds an unrestricted license on the date of application.

(b) An applicant may elect to retire upon renewal or upon submission of an application to the board as required.

(c) A retired licensee shall be exempt from continuing education requirements.

(d) A retired licensee shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title.

(e) A retired licensee shall not be entitled to practice as a psychiatric technician.

(f) The board may investigate potential violations or take action against a retired license for a violation of this chapter.

(g) The board may reinstate a retired license to active status if the retired licensee fulfills the requirements for renewal of a license, including furnishing fingerprints, paying renewal fees, and providing evidence of the following, as applicable:

(1) For a retired licensee who has been retired for four years or fewer, the amount of continuing education required for the renewal of an active license.

(2) For a retired licensee who has been retired for more than four years, either a
 current valid active and clear registered nurse license, psychiatric technician license, or an equivalent license in another state, a United States territory, or Canada, or passing the current examination for licensure.

(h) The fee to be paid upon filing the application for a retired license shall be fifty dollars ($50) unless a higher fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), is established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 13.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4546.

The board shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received by it pursuant to this chapter and at the same time pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4547.

(a) All expenses incurred in the operation of this chapter or Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) shall be paid out of the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund from the revenue received by the board under this chapter or Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) and deposited in the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 510, Sec. 26.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4548.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter in connection with the issuance of licenses under its provisions shall be according to the following schedule:

(a) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for licensure by examination by applicants who have successfully completed a prescribed course of study in a California-approved school for preparation of psychiatric technicians shall be two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) unless a higher fee, not to exceed three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), is established by the board.

(b) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for licensure by examination by applicants who are qualified to take the examination by
 methods other than as described in subdivision (a) shall be two hundred ninety-five dollars ($295) unless a higher fee, not to exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375), is established by the board.

(c) The fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for licensure by endorsement shall be two hundred twenty dollars ($220) unless a higher fee, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300), is established by the board.

(d) The fee to be paid for taking each examination for licensure shall be the actual cost to purchase an examination from a vendor approved by the board.

(e) The fee to be paid for any examination for licensure after the first shall be two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) unless a higher fee, not to exceed three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), is established by the board.

(f) The biennial renewal fee to be paid upon the filing of an application for renewal shall be two hundred twenty dollars ($220) unless a higher fee, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300), is established by the board.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the delinquency fee for failure to pay the biennial renewal fee within the prescribed time shall be one hundred ten dollars ($110) unless a higher fee, not to exceed 50 percent of the regular renewal fee and in no case more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), is established by the board.

(h) The initial license fee is an amount equal to the biennial renewal fee in effect on the date the application for the license is filed.

(i) The fee to be paid for an interim permit shall be twenty dollars ($20)
 unless a higher fee, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), is established by the board. 

(j) The fee to be paid for a duplicate license or wall certificate shall be in an amount not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) and may be fixed by the board at an amount no more than fifty dollars ($50).

(k) The fee to be paid for processing verification of licensure papers to other states shall be twenty dollars ($20) unless a higher fee, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), is established by the board.

(l) The fee to be paid for postlicensure certification in blood withdrawal shall be twenty dollars ($20) unless a higher fee, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), is established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 22.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. Massage Therapy Act [4600. - 4621.]

4600.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Massage Therapy Act. Whenever a reference is made to the Massage Therapy Act by any statute, it shall be construed to refer to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act enable consumers and local governments to more easily identify certified massage professionals, provide for consistent statewide certification and oversight of massage professionals, ensure that schools approved by the council that are teaching massage provide a high level of training, assist local governments and law enforcement in meeting their duty to maintain the highest standards of conduct in massage establishments by vetting and disciplining certificate holders, provide for a self-funded nonprofit oversight body to certify massage professionals, and ensure full compliance with, and execution of, the requirements of this act.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that broad control over land use in
 regulating massage establishments be vested in local governments so that they may manage those establishments in the best interests of the individual community, and that the requirements and practice of the profession of massage therapy remain a matter of statewide concern, regulation, and oversight. Local governments should give strong consideration to establishing a registration program that grants local governments the ability to either suspend or revoke a registration of massage business for specific violations.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that local governments, law enforcement, nonprofit stakeholders, the massage industry, and massage professionals work together going forward to improve communication and share information to further increase the value of statewide certification, to collaborate in the implementation of this act, and to develop a model ordinance reflecting best practices in massage regulation for cities and
 counties to adopt that will respect local control, patient privacy, and the dignity of the profession of massage therapy.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in extending the council’s powers and duties through the sunset review process that the council continue to serve as an entity entrusted with administering a state function in its certification of massage therapy professionals and approval of massage education programs.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that both state and local regulation of massage therapy reflect the recognized status of certified massage professionals as health care providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4601.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Approved school” or “approved massage school” means a school approved by the council that meets minimum standards for training and curriculum in massage and related subjects, that meets any of the following requirements, and that has not been otherwise unapproved by the council:

(1) Is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(2) Is approved by the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(3) Is an
 institution accredited by the Accrediting Commission for Senior Colleges and Universities or the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges and that is one of the following:

(A) A public institution.

(B) An institution incorporated and lawfully operating as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and that is not managed by any entity for profit.

(C) A for-profit institution.

(D) An institution that does not meet all of the criteria in subparagraph (B) that is incorporated and lawfully
 operating as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, that has been in continuous operation since April 15, 1997, and that is not managed by any entity for profit.

(4) Is a college or university of the state higher education system, as defined in Section 100850 of the Education Code.

(5) Is a school requiring equal or greater training than what is required pursuant to this chapter and is recognized by the corresponding agency in another state or accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(b) “Certificate” means a valid certificate issued by the council pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Compensation” means a payment, loan, advance, donation, contribution, deposit, or gift of money, or anything of value.

(d) “Council” means the California Massage Therapy Council created pursuant to this chapter, which shall be a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(e) “Massage” means the scientific manipulation of the soft tissues. For purposes of this chapter, the terms “massage” and “bodywork” shall have the same meaning.

(f) “Massage establishment” or “establishment” means a fixed
 location where massage is performed for compensation, excluding those locations where massage is only provided on an out-call basis.

(g) “Massage practitioner” means a person who is certified by the council pursuant to Section 4604.2 and who administers massage for compensation.

(h) “Massage therapist” means a person who is certified by the council under Section 4604 and who administers massage for compensation.

(i) “Sole provider” means a massage business where the owner owns 100 percent of the business, is the only person who provides massage services for compensation for that business pursuant to a valid and active certificate issued in accordance with this chapter, and has no other employees
 or independent contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4602.
